Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-115
Assistant attorney general assigned to commission; compensation; payment.

The Attorney General of Nebraska shall designate an assistant attorney general or assistant attorneys general, when requested by the commission and directed by the Governor, and the services of such assistant attorney general or assistant attorneys general shall be available to the commission whenever demanded. The compensation of such assistant attorney general or assistant attorneys general as are assigned to the commission shall be paid by the office of the Attorney General.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 24, p. 389;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-324;

R.S.1943, § 53-115;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 5.